Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1707
Equipment, defined.

Equipment shall mean machines, all electrical devices, video or audio devices, molds, display racks, vending machines, coin-operated game machines, machines which dispense products, and display units of all kinds.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 7.